Utah statutes.
62A-4a-303.   Director's responsibility.
The director shall:
(1)  contract with public or private nonprofit organizations, agencies,
schools, or with qualified individuals to establish voluntary community-based
educational and service programs designed to reduce the occurrence or
recurrence of abuse and neglect;
(2)  facilitate the exchange of information between and among groups concerned
with families and children;
(3)  consult with appropriate state agencies, commissions, and boards to help
determine the probable effectiveness, fiscal soundness, and need for proposed
education and service programs for the prevention and treatment of abuse and
neglect;
(4)  develop policies to determine whether programs will be discontinued or
will receive continuous funding;
(5)  establish flexible fees and fee schedules based on the recipient's
ability to pay for part or all of the costs of service received; and
(6)  adopt rules under Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, as necessary to carry out the purposes of this part.
